Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,104
Directors' liability for unlawful
distributions.

(MBCA
8.33) (a) A director who votes for or assents to a distribution in excess
of what may be authorized and made pursuant to subsection (a) of section 21-252
or subsection (a) of section 21-2,192 is personally liable to the corporation
for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed
without violating subsection (a) of section 21-252 or subsection (a) of section
21-2,192 if the party asserting liability establishes that when taking the
action the director did not comply with section 21-2,102.

(b) A director held liable
under subsection (a) of this section for an unlawful distribution is entitled
to:

(1)
Contribution from every other director who could be held liable under subsection
(a) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

(2) Recoupment from each
shareholder of the pro rata portion of the amount of the unlawful distribution
the shareholder accepted, knowing the distribution was made in violation of
subsection (a) of section 21-252 or subsection (a) of section 21-2,192.

(c) A proceeding to enforce:

(1) The liability of
a director under subsection (a) of this section is barred unless it is commenced
within two years after the date (i) on which the effect of the distribution
was measured under subsection (e) or (g) of section 21-252, (ii) as of which
the violation of subsection (a) of section 21-252 occurred as the consequence
of disregard of a restriction in the articles of incorporation, or (iii) on
which the distribution of assets to shareholders under subsection (a) of section
21-2,192 was made; or

(2)
Contribution or recoupment under subsection (b) of this section is barred
unless it is commenced within one year after the liability of the claimant
has been finally adjudicated under subsection (a) of this section.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 104.
January 1, 2016